Massachusetts, session 194th, H2843.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. For the purposes of this act, the following word shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meaning:
“State employees retirement board” or “board”, the board established in section 18 of
chapter 10 of the General Laws for the purposes of administering the state employees’ retirement
system.
“State university”, an institution listed in section 5 of chapter 15A of the General Laws.
“State universities retirement incentive program” or “program”, the program established
in section 3.
of 8

SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
universities shall achieve direct payroll savings in fiscal year 2027 and beyond through
implementation of this act.
(b) To achieve the savings required by subsection (a), a state university may: (i) offer 1-
time incentive payments to encourage employees to resign or retire; or (ii) implement the
retirement incentive program as described in sections 3 to 7, inclusive.
(b) The state universities shall, not later than March 20, 2026, provide notice to the state
board of retirement on the number of employees anticipated to separate from state service, and
anticipated timing, under clauses (i) and (ii) of subsection (b).
SECTION 3. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall establish and implement a
retirement incentive for employees of state universities, to be known as the state universities
retirement incentive program.
(b) To be considered eligible by the state board of retirement for any of the benefit
options under the program, an employee shall: (i) be an employee, as of the effective date of this
act and through the date of retirement established in section 4, of a state university, the board of
trustees of which has approved participation in this program by January 1, 2026; (ii) be a
member in service of the state employees’ retirement system pursuant to clause (i) of paragraph
(a) of subdivision (1) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws as of the effective date of
this act and have 25 years or more of creditable state service at the time of their program
application; (iii) be classified in Group 1 of the state employees’ retirement system pursuant to
paragraph (g) of subdivision (2) of said section 3 of said chapter 32 as of the effective date of
of 8

this act; (iv) be eligible to receive a superannuation retirement allowance in the absence of the
program pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 5 of said chapter 32 or subdivision (1) of section
10 of said chapter 32 as of the effective date of this act; (v) have not notified, in writing, as of
January 1, 2026, either the state university or the state board of retirement of their planned
retirement or separation from the university within the next year; and (vi) file a timely
application with the board pursuant to section 4.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), the following employees shall not be eligible
to receive any benefit from the program: (i) employees whose compensation is funded from a
capital appropriation or federal grant, as each is defined in section 1 of chapter 29 of the General
Laws, as of the filing date for the application pursuant to section 4; (ii) elected officials; and (iii)
employees or members of the state employees’ retirement system who, as of the effective date of
this act, are not contributing to the retirement system or have not completed reinstatement
pursuant to section 105 of said chapter 32.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, an eligible
employee shall submit an application to the state board of retirement on or before April 1, 2024
in order for the employee to be eligible to receive the retirement benefit provided in this act. The
retirement date requested in an eligible employee’s application shall be June 30, 2026 or, upon a
state university’s local board of trustees’ approval for delay resulting from multiple employees
from the same division choosing to participate in this program or university need, a delayed
retirement date of no later than December 31, 2026. Employees may rescind their notice of
retirement, up to the earlier of: (i) 1 week prior to their submitted retirement date; or (ii) 1 week
prior to an offer of employment for a replacement hire in situations where a replacement hire has
of 8

been approved. The application for retirement may be delivered to the state board of retirement
in person, by mail or in a manner as the board may approve, including by electronic means.
SECTION 5. (a) An employee who is eligible for the state universities retirement
incentive program may request in the application for retirement that the state board of retirement
credit the employee with an additional retirement benefit pursuant to this section. Each such
employee shall request and receive a combination of years of creditable service and years of age,
in full-credit increments; provided however, that the sum of the years of creditable service and
years of age shall not be greater than 6 total credits for the purposes of determining the
employee’s superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of
section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. The employee’s state university of record shall pay
to the state board of retirement 2.5 per cent of the participant’s highest 3-year annual average
salary for each purchased credit up to a maximum of 6 purchased credits towards their retirement
benefit, with 6 credits representing the aggregate payment of 15 per cent of the participant’s
highest 3-year annual average salary. The program participant shall pay to the state board of
retirement 4.5 per cent of the participant’s highest 3-year annual average salary, plus an
additional 1.0 per cent of the participant’s highest 3-year annual average salary above $30,000,
for each purchased credit (year of age or year of service) up to a maximum of 6 total purchased
credits. Such payment, upon the participant’s approval, may be directed from the state university
directly to the state board of retirement from compensated absences payouts at the time of the
participant’s retirement. Failure of participants to make such payments for the purchase of credits
to the state board of retirement shall result in no addition to the participant’s creditable years
being considered in the determination of retirement benefits until payments are made.
of 8

Notwithstanding the credit, the total normal yearly amount of the retirement allowance,
as determined pursuant to said section 5 of said chapter 32, of any employee who retires and
receives the program benefit shall not exceed 80 per cent of the average annual rate of the
employee’s regular compensation as determined pursuant to said section 5 of said chapter 32.
(b) An employee shall not: (i) be eligible for both of the 2 different retirement incentives
as noted in clauses (i) and (ii) of subsection (b) of section 2 (b); (ii) become eligible for 1
incentive by virtue of the application of a different incentive; and (iii) utilize the incentive to
qualify for any other rights or benefits under chapter 32 of the General Laws. An employee who
retires and receives an additional retirement benefit pursuant to this act shall be considered
retired for superannuation purposes under said chapter 32 and shall be subject to said chapter 32.
A married employee who retires and receives an additional benefit under this act shall be subject
to the requirements of the second paragraph of subdivision (1) of section 12 of said chapter 32.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, an eligible employee retiring under the state universities retirement incentive
program who has served in more than one group shall receive a retirement allowance as if the
employee served only as a Group 1 employee for the entire length of state service and shall not
receive a retirement allowance consisting of pro-rated benefits based upon the percentage of total
years of service that the employee rendered in each group.
SECTION 6. The state board of retirement shall provide retirement counseling to
employees who apply to retire under the state universities retirement incentive program or to
eligible employees who request retirement counseling. Counseling services shall be scheduled
between December 1, 2025 and April 1, 2026. Counseling by the board shall include, but need
of 8

not be limited to: (i) a full explanation of the retirement benefits provided by the program; (ii) a
comparison of the expected lifetime retirement benefits payable to an employee under the
retirement incentive program and under chapter 32 of the General Laws; (iii) the election of a
100 retirement option under section 12 of said chapter 32; (iv) the restrictions on employment after
101 retirement; (v) the laws relative to the payment of cost-of-living adjustments to the retirement
102 allowance; and (vi) the effect of federal and state taxation on retirement income. The group
103 insurance commission shall provide counseling regarding the provision of health care benefits
104 under chapter 32A of the General Laws. Each employee shall sign a statement that the employee
105 has received counseling or has elected not to receive counseling prior to the approval by the
106 board of the employee's application for superannuation benefits and the additional benefit
107 provided by this act.
108 SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general or special law or any collective bargaining
109 agreement or other employment contract to the contrary and in consideration of the benefits
110 conferred in this act, an employee who elects to retire under this act shall receive payment for
111 accrued vacation time, buyback of pro-rated unused sick leave, and other benefits under the
112 collective bargaining agreement or other employment contract. The board shall deny an
113 application for the state universities retirement incentive program under this act by an employee
114 who belongs to a bargaining unit for which a collective bargaining agreement inconsistent with
115 this section is in effect at the time of the application unless the employee organization
116 representing the employee has filed with the board and the secretary of administration and
117 finance a statement waiving any inconsistent provisions of the agreement on behalf of all
118 members of the bargaining unit who file applications for the retirement incentive program
119 pursuant to this act.
of 8

120 SECTION 8. Notwithstanding section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, an employee
121 retired under this act may teach on a part-time basis or accept part-time state employment subject
122 only to the limitations provided by law. A member who retired under the state universities
123 retirement incentive program shall be eligible for reinstatement under section 105 of said chapter
124 32. If an individual who receives an incentive through this program subsequently accepts full-
125 time employment with any state agency, including a state university, the employee shall: (i)
126 repay the cash incentive payment; or (ii) lose the additional creditable years of service or age. If
127 the employee loses the additional creditable years of service or age, the state board of retirement
128 shall repay the state university and employee, as appropriate, for any purchased service and age
129 credits, with no interest, as determined by the state board of retirement.
130 SECTION 9. Not later than June 1, 2026, the secretary of administration and finance
131 shall file with the house and senate committees on ways and means a report detailing: the
132 number of employee applications received for the state universities retirement incentive
133 program; the anticipated dates of retirement for each participant; the official positions of the
134 employees; and the impact of program participation on each state university’s ability to carry out
135 its responsibilities as provided by law. Further, this report shall detail the implementation of
136 clauses (i) and (ii) of subsection (b) of section 2, including: (i) the number of employees who
137 plan to separate from state service pursuant to each clause; (ii) the timing of each planned
138 separation; (iii) the official positions of the employees; (iv) the impact that all completed and
139 anticipated separations will have on each state university’s ability to carry out its responsibilities
140 as provided by law; and (v) the estimated net cost-savings in fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
141 2030 for each state university associated with implementation of this program.
of 8

142 SECTION 10. Participating state university shall certify, to the state comptroller and the
143 state board of retirement, the following information 15 days prior to the various dates of
144 retirement: (i) the current annual salary as well as the salary at date of retirement of each
145 individual who has enrolled in the state universities retirement incentive program; (ii) the item of
146 appropriation in which the position is funded; (iii) the classification and title of the position; (iv)
147 the retirement date for the person who will retire from the position; and, (v) the amounts of
148 projected accrued vacation time, unused sick leave buyback or other accrued benefits for each
149 employee as of the employee’s date of retirement.
150 SECTION 11. The executive director of the public employee retirement administration
151 commission, established in section 49 of chapter 7 of the General Laws, shall analyze, study and
152 evaluate the costs and actuarial liabilities attributable to the additional benefits payable pursuant
153 to this act. Not later than September 30, 2030, the commission shall file a report with the
154 secretary of administration and finance, the joint committee on public service and the house and
155 senate committees on ways and means regarding its findings.
156 SECTION 12. Not later than November 30, 2030, the secretary of administration and
157 finance shall file with the house and senate committees on ways and means a subsequent report
158 detailing: (i) the number of employees participating in the state universities retirement incentive
159 program; (ii) the estimated costs and savings in fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year 2030 as a
160 result of the employees’ participation; and (iii) the number of positions that have been either
161 refilled or not refilled during those periods. For each position that has not been refilled, the report
162 shall detail how the duties and expertise associated with the position have been fulfilled or
163 otherwise accounted for by the state university.
of 8